test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_konaas_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikonaasimiwaaibaning
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikonaasimiwaaibanan
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikonaasimiwaaibanag
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasiminaanibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasiminaanibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasiminaanibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gikonaasiminiibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gikonaasiminiibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gikonaasiminiibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasimiwaaibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasimiwaaibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasimiwaaibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: okonaasiminaanibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: okonaasiminaanibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: okonaasiminaanibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: okonaasiminiibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: okonaasiminiibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: okonaasiminiibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: okonaasimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: okonaasimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: okonaasimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: okonaasimiwaaibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: okonaasimiwaaibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: okonaasimiwaaibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasiminaanibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasiminaanibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasiminaanibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikonaasiminiibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikonaasiminiibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikonaasiminiibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasimini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasimini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasimini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasimiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasimiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasimiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikonaasishinaanibaning
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikonaasishinaanibanan
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikonaasishinaanibanag
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikonaasishiniibaning
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikonaasishiniibanan
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikonaasishiniibanag
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikonaasishiwaaibaning
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikonaasishiwaaibanan
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikonaasishiwaaibanag
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasishinaanibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasishinaanibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasishinaanibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gikonaasishiniibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gikonaasishiniibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gikonaasishiniibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gikonaasishiwaaibaning
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gikonaasishiwaaibanan
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gikonaasishiwaaibanag
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: okonaasishinaanibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: okonaasishinaanibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: okonaasishinaanibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: okonaasishiniibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: okonaasishiniibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: okonaasishiniibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: okonaasishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: okonaasishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: okonaasishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: okonaasishiwaaibaning
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: okonaasishiwaaibanan
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: okonaasishiwaaibanag
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: okonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: okonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: okonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikonaasishiniibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikonaasishiniibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikonaasishiniibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikonaasishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikonaasishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikonaasishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefkonaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikonaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: konaasenhimishinaaniban
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: konaasenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: konaasenhimishiniiban
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: konaasenhimishini***idig, idog***
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: konaasenhimishiwaaiban
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: konaasenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: konaasensimishinaaniban
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: konaasensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: konaasensimishiniiban
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: konaasensimishini***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: konaasensimishiwaaiban
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: konaasensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasenhimishinaaning
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasenhimishinaanan
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasenhimishinaanag
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: konaasenhimishiniing
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: konaasenhimishinian
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: konaasenhimishiniag
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: konaasenhimishiwaaing
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: konaasenhimishiwaaan
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: konaasenhimishiwaaag
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasensimishinaaning
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasensimishinaanan
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasensimishinaanag
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: konaasensimishiniing
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: konaasensimishinian
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: konaasensimishiniag
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: konaasensimishiwaaing
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: konaasensimishiwaaan
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: konaasensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: konaasenhimishibaning
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: konaasenhimishibanan
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: konaasenhimishibanag
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhimish***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: konaasensimishibaning
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: konaasensimishibanan
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: konaasensimishibanag
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: konaasensimish***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: konaasensimish***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: konaasensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: konaasenhiminaanibaning
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: konaasenhiminaanibanan
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: konaasenhiminaanibanag
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: konaasenhiminiibaning
     konaas+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: konaasenhiminiibanan
